Idaho, session 2026, H0607.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Title 67, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby amended
by the addition thereto of a NEW CHAPTER, to be known and designated as Chap-
ter 48, Title 67, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
CHAPTER 48
PROTECTING PRIVACY AND SAFETY IN GOVERNMENT BUILDINGS
67-4801. LEGISLATIVE FINDINGS. The legislature finds and declares
that:
(1) There are real, inherent, and enduring physical differences be-
tween men and women.
(2) Every individual retains a natural right to privacy and safety, es-
pecially in restrooms and changing facilities where such individual might be
in a partial or full state of undress in the presence of others.
(3) Requiring individuals to share restrooms and changing facilities
with members of the other sex infringes on their interest in privacy and
generates potential embarrassment, shame, and psychological injury to those
individuals.
(4) Requiring individuals to share restrooms and changing facilities
with members of the other sex creates real privacy and safety concerns by
increasing the likelihood of sexual assault, molestation, rape, voyeurism,
and exhibitionism.
(5) There are numerous well-documented examples illustrating that
there are real privacy and safety implications when members of one sex are
permitted to access restrooms and changing facilities designated for use by
the other sex.


(6) The legislature has the clear authority, as acknowledged by the
ninth and tenth amendments to the constitution of the United States, to enact
legislation to safeguard the natural rights of privacy and safety.
(7) A policy maintaining sex-separated restrooms and changing facili-
ties in government buildings is substantially related to the important gov-
ernmental interest in protecting the privacy, safety, and dignity of indi-
viduals using such spaces.
67-4802. DEFINITIONS. For the purposes of this chapter:
(1) "Changing facility" means a facility in which an individual may be
in a state of undress in the presence of others, including a locker room,
changing room, or shower room.
(2) "Female" has the same meaning as defined in section 73-114, Idaho
Code.
(3) "Government building" means any building or facility owned or
leased by a government entity and shall include any building or facility that
a government entity leases from the property owner. If a government entity
leases only a portion of a building, then only the portion of the building
leased by the government entity shall be treated as a government building.
(4) "Government entity" means the state or any city, county, municipal-
ity, or other political subdivision or administrative unit of the state.
(5) "Male" has the same meaning as defined in section 73-114, Idaho
Code.
(6) "Sex" has the same meaning as defined in section 73-114, Idaho Code.
67-4803. GOVERNMENT BUILDING RESTROOMS AND CHANGING FACILITIES. (1)
Every government building restroom or changing facility accessible by mul-
tiple individuals at the same time shall be:
(a) Designated for use by male individuals only or female individuals
only; and
(b) Used only by individuals of the sex corresponding to the designa-
tion provided for in paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(2) No individual shall enter a multi-occupancy restroom or changing
facility within a government building that is designated for one (1) sex un-
less such individual is a member of that sex.
(3) The government entity with authority over the government building
shall provide its users with privacy from members of the other sex in every
restroom and changing facility.
67-4804. EXEMPTIONS. This chapter shall not apply:
(1) To single-occupancy restrooms and changing facilities;
(2) To single-occupancy restrooms and changing facilities that are
conspicuously designated for family use;
(3) To restrooms and changing facilities that have been temporarily
designated for use by the other sex;
(4) To an individual who uses a restroom or changing facility desig-
nated for the other sex if such restroom or changing facility is the only re-
stroom or changing facility reasonably available at the time of the individ-
ual's use of the facility, provided that such individual ensures that no per-


son of the opposite sex is using the restroom or changing facility prior to
entering the facility;
(5) To an individual employed to clean, maintain, or inspect a restroom
or changing facility while such individual is actively engaged in the activ-
ity for which the individual has been employed, provided that such individ-
ual ensures no person of the opposite sex is using the restroom or changing
facility prior to entering the facility;
(6) To an individual who enters a restroom or changing facility to ren-
der medical assistance;
(7) To a law enforcement official engaged in law enforcement activities
or supervising any arrestee, detainee, or inmate in a custodial setting;
(8) To an individual who enters a restroom or changing facility to ac-
company and render assistance to a person who is in need of assistance if such
person rendering assistance is:
(a) A family member or a legal guardian of the person needing assis-
tance; or
(b) The designee of the person in need of assistance and the designee is
not a member of the designated sex for the single-sex restroom or chang-
ing facility.
(9) To a minor child who is in need of assistance and, for the purposes
of receiving that assistance, is accompanied by a family member, a legal
guardian, or the individual's designee who is a member of the designated sex
for the single-sex restroom or changing facility;
(10) To coaching staff and personnel during athletic events, provided
that such individuals take reasonable steps to ensure that no person is in a
state of undress prior to entering the facility; or
(11) During an ongoing natural disaster or emergency, or when necessary
to prevent a serious threat to good order or public safety.
67-4805. REASONABLE ACCOMMODATION. (1) A government entity with au-
thority over any government building may provide a reasonable accommodation
to any individual who for any reason is unwilling or unable to use a multi-oc-
cupancy restroom or changing facility designated for the individual's sex in
a government building.
(2) A reasonable accommodation shall not include access to a restroom
or changing facility that is designated for use by members of the other sex
while individuals of the other sex are present or could be present.
67-4806. CIVIL CAUSE OF ACTION. (1) Any individual who, while access-
ing or using a government building multi-occupancy restroom or changing fa-
cility designated for use by the individual's sex, encounters a member of the
other sex shall have a private cause of action against the government entity
with authority over the government building if:
(a) The government entity gave the member of the other sex permission to
use the restroom or changing facility designated for use by the individ-
ual's sex; or
(b) The government entity failed to take reasonable steps to prohibit
the member of the other sex from accessing the restroom or changing fa-
cility designated for use by the individual's sex.


(2) Any civil action arising under this chapter must be commenced
within two (2) years after the cause of action has occurred.
(3) Any plaintiff who prevails in an action brought under this chap-
ter may recover from the defendant government entity ten thousand dollars
($10,000) for each instance that the plaintiff encountered a member of the
other sex while accessing or using a government building restroom or chang-
ing facility designated for use by the plaintiff's sex. The plaintiff may
also recover monetary damages from the defendant government entity for all
psychological, emotional, and physical harm suffered.
(4) Any plaintiff who prevails in an action brought under this chapter
is entitled to recover reasonable attorney's fees and costs from the defen-
dant government entity.
(5) Nothing in this chapter limits other remedies at law or equity
available to the plaintiff against the government entity.
67-4807. PREEMPTION. This chapter preempts any law, regulation, pol-
icy, or decree enacted or adopted by any government entity within the state
that purports to permit or require government entities to allow individuals
to use restrooms and changing facilities in government buildings designated
for use by the other sex.
67-4808. LIMITATIONS. (1) The provisions of this chapter shall not ap-
ply to any covered entity as that term is defined in section 67-9801, Idaho
Code.
(2) The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to any public school
as that term is defined in section 33-6702, Idaho Code.
(3) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to require any govern-
ment entity to unlawfully violate the terms of an existing lease agreement.
SECTION 2. That Title 6, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby amended
by the addition thereto of a NEW CHAPTER, to be known and designated as Chap-
ter 40, Title 6, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
CHAPTER 40
LIABILITY FOR PLACES OF PUBLIC ACCOMMODATION
6-4001. LEGISLATIVE FINDINGS. The legislature finds and declares
that:
(1) Land possessors have a duty of care at common law to maintain their
premises in such a way as to reasonably prevent harm to those entering their
property.
(2) Idaho "adheres to the traditional common-law jurisprudence that
developed around premises liability." Oswald v. Costco Wholesale Corpora-
tion, 167 Idaho 540, 551 (2020).
(3) A land possessor owes an "affirmative duty" to protect members of
the public he has invited when he "open[ed] his property to the public for
business," which reflects the "age-old principle" that an invitee is "enti-
tled to visit and assume that the premises have been made safe for his visit."
Id. at 552.


(4) Land possessors "can be liable for failing to protect invitees
against the foreseeable negligence or criminal acts of third parties." Id.
at 553.
(5) Allowing individuals to share restrooms or changing facilities
with members of the other sex generates potential embarrassment, shame, and
psychological injury to invitees, as well as increasing the likelihood of
sexual assault, molestation, rape, voyeurism, and exhibitionism.
(6) Land possessors owe a duty to protect the privacy and safety of in-
vitees from members of the other sex in restrooms and changing facilities
provided to their customers or the public.
6-4002. DEFINITIONS. For the purposes of this chapter:
(1) "Changing facility" means a facility in which an individual may be
in a state of undress in the presence of others, including a locker room,
changing room, or shower room.
(2) "Place of public accommodation" means a business, accommodation,
refreshment, entertainment, recreation, or transportation facility of any
kind, whether licensed or not, whose goods, services, facilities, privi-
leges, advantages, or accommodations are extended, offered, sold, or other-
wise made available to the public.
(3) "Sex" has the same meaning as defined in section 73-114, Idaho Code.
6-4003. DUTIES OF PLACES OF PUBLIC ACCOMMODATION. Every place of pub-
lic accommodation shall have a duty to take reasonable steps to ensure that
the privacy and safety of an individual is protected from members of the
other sex in every restroom or changing facility maintained by the place of
public accommodation.
6-4004. EXEMPTIONS. It shall not be a breach of the duty provided in
section 6-4003, Idaho Code, if the place of public accommodation:
(1) Provides single-occupancy restrooms or changing facilities;
(2) Provides single-occupancy restrooms or changing facilities that
are conspicuously designated for family use;
(3) Temporarily designates a restroom or changing facility for use by
the other sex;
(4) Allows an individual of one sex to use a restroom or changing facil-
ity designated for the other sex if such restroom or changing facility is the
only restroom or changing facility reasonably available at the time of the
individual's use of the facility;
(5) Allows an individual employed to clean, maintain, or inspect a re-
stroom or changing facility, while such individual is actively engaged in
the activity for which the individual has been employed;
(6) Allows an individual to enter a restroom or changing facility to
render medical assistance;
(7) Allows a law enforcement official engaged in law enforcement activ-
ities or supervising any arrestee, detainee, or inmate in a custodial set-
ting to enter a restroom or changing facility;
(8) Allows an individual to enter a restroom or changing facility to ac-
company and render assistance to a person who is in need of assistance when
the person rendering assistance is:


(a) A family member or a legal guardian; or
(b) The designee of the person in need of assistance and the designee is
not a member of the designated sex for the single-sex restroom or chang-
ing facility.
(9) Allows a minor child who is in need of assistance to accompany a fam-
ily member, a legal guardian, or other designee into a restroom or changing
facility, provided that the family member, legal guardian, or other designee
is a member of the designated sex for the single-sex restroom or changing fa-
cility;
(10) Allows coaching staff and personnel during athletic events to ac-
cess a restroom or changing facility; or
(11) Allows access to a restroom or changing facility during an ongoing
natural disaster or emergency, or when necessary to prevent a serious threat
to good order or public safety.
6-4005. REASONABLE ACCOMMODATIONS. Nothing in this chapter shall be
construed to prohibit a place of public accommodation from providing a rea-
sonable accommodation to any individual who for any reason is unwilling or
unable to use a multi-occupancy restroom or changing facility designated for
that individual's sex, provided that a place of public accommodation shall
not provide a reasonable accommodation that results in the privacy or safety
of another individual being violated by a member of the other sex.
6-4006. LIABILITY FOR PLACES OF PUBLIC ACCOMMODATION. (1) A place of
public accommodation that breaches its duty of care as described in section
6-4003, Idaho Code, shall be liable for all damages attributable to its neg-
ligence, including any psychological, emotional, and physical harm.
(2) It shall not be a breach of the duty provided in section 6-4003,
Idaho Code, if the privacy or safety of an individual was violated because
such individual entered a restroom or changing facility designated for use
by the other sex.
(3) Any civil action arising under this chapter must be commenced
within two (2) years after the cause of action has occurred.
(4) Nothing in this chapter limits other remedies at law or equity
available to the plaintiff.
6-4007. PREEMPTION. This chapter preempts any law, regulation, pol-
icy, or decree enacted or adopted by any government entity within the state
that purports to permit or require places of public accommodation to permit
individuals to use restrooms and changing facilities designated for use by
the other sex.
6-4008. LIMITATIONS. (1) The provisions of this chapter shall not ap-
ply to any covered entity as that term is defined in section 67-9801, Idaho
Code.
(2) The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to any public school
as that term is defined in section 33-6702, Idaho Code.
(3) The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to any government en-
tity as that term is defined in section 67-4802, Idaho Code.


SECTION 3. SEVERABILITY. The provisions of this act are hereby declared
to be severable and if any provision of this act or the application of such
provision to any person or circumstance is declared invalid for any reason,
such declaration shall not affect the validity of the remaining portions of
this act.
SECTION 4. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.